Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2685.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "E conomic development tax credit." A tax credit established for the purpose of long-term, strategic planning to improve a community's financial well-being and quality of life, with a primary focus on any of the following:(1) Business creation, attraction, retention or expansion.(2) Economic growth.(3) Expanding the community's local tax base to fund public services, including schools, roads and parks.(4) Improving infrastructure to make the community a more attractive place to live and work.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1710-A.1. Tax credits relating to economic development.(a) Requirements.--An entity that is awarded an economic development tax credit shall:(1) C omply with all provisions and requirements of the the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(2) Only employ individuals who are Pennsylvania residents.(3) Use 100% materials sourced from this Commonwealth. If it is impossible to source 100% of the materials from this Commonwealth, the entity shall source the material from the United States, but not outside of the United States.(b) Duty of Department of Community and Economic Development.--The Department of Community and Economic Development shall annually audit all entities that were awarded an economic development tax credit to ensure that the entity is in compliance with subsection (a).20260HB2685PN3740 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Penalty.--An entity that is awarded an economic development tax credit and fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall repay to the Commonwealth the amount of the economic development tax credit awarded.Section 3. The addition of section 1710-A.1 of the act shall apply to a tax credit awarded on or after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2685PN3740 - 3 - 12345678